dev/testp.dix
    <pardef n="faoi__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>faoi</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>faoisean</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>faoi-sean</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>faoi-seo</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>faoi-sin</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fé</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fésan</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fé-san</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fé-seo</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fé-sin</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fút</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fútsa</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fút-sa</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fút-seo</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fút-sin</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúthu</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúthusan</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúthu-san</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúthu-seo</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúthu-sin</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúm</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúmsa</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúm-sa</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúm-seo</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúm-sin</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúibh</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúibhse</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúibh-se</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúibh-seo</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúibh-sin</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúinn</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúinne</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithi</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithise</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithi-se</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithi-seo</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithi-sin</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithe</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithese</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithe-se</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithe-seo</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fúithe-sin</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CU"><p><l>fá</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CU"><p><l>fásan</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CU"><p><l>fá-san</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CU"><p><l>fá-seo</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CU"><p><l>fá-sin</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>faoi</l><r><a/>faoi<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>faoi</l><r>faoi<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="faoi" a="irishfst"><i/><par n="faoi__pr"/></e>
